New York, session 2025-2026, S9472.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law or any other provision of law to the contrary, Ivan Cruz 3 shall be eligible to take the competitive civil service examination for 4 the position of police officer and shall, contingent upon his score on 5 such examination, be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for 6 appointment as a full-time police officer for the Broome county depart- 7 ment of personnel. 8 § 2. Ivan Cruz shall otherwise be subject to the merit and fitness 9 provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time police offi- 10 cers. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14598-01-6